Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,240
Certified professional, defined.

Certified professional means a private onsite wastewater treatment system professional certified under the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act to perform the tasks for which the certification has been issued.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 5.